District of Columbia statutes.
29-1205.11

Delegation by trustee.

(a)

A trustee may delegate duties and powers. The trustee shall exercise the care a person in a similar position would reasonably believe appropriate under similar circumstances in:

(1)

Selecting an agent;

(2)

Establishing the scope and terms of the delegation; and

(3)

Periodically reviewing the agent’s actions to monitor the agent’s performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

(b)

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, a trustee may delegate duties and powers to a co-trustee.

(c)

In performing a delegated function, an agent of a trustee shall owe a duty to the statutory trust to exercise reasonable care to comply with the terms of the delegation.

(d)

A trustee that complies with subsection (a) of this section shall not be liable to a beneficial owner or to the statutory trust for an act or omission of the agent of the trustee to which a function was delegated.

(e)

An agent of a trustee submits to the jurisdiction of the courts of the District by accepting a delegation of powers or duties from a trustee with respect to a claim related to the agency.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 511 of the Uniform Statutory Trust Entity Act.

Editor's Notes